Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 85.3A, as
amended by Section 53, Chapter 228, O.S.L. 2022 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 85.3A), is amended to read as follows:
Section 85.3A. A. Compliance with the provisions of the
Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act shall not be required of:
1. County government;
2. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, the
institutions, centers or other constituent agencies of The Oklahoma
State System of Higher Education;
3. The telecommunications network known as OneNet;

4. The Department of Public Safety gun range;
5. The State Treasurer for the following purchases:
a. services including, but not limited to, legal services
to assist in the administration of the Uniform
Unclaimed Property Act, as provided in Section 668 of
Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and
b. software, hardware and associated services to assist
in the administration of funds and securities held by
the state, as provided in Section 71.2 of Title 62 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. Statutorily allowed interagency agreements between state
agencies;
7. The Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs, in accordance
with Section 63.22 of Title 72 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
8. The Oklahoma Military Department of the State of Oklahoma
for the purchases of heraldry items including, but limited to,
medals, badges and other military accoutrements;
9. A transaction, wholly funded by monies other than state-
derived funds, in which a state agency functions only as a pass-
through conduit to fund an acquisition that is required by the
funding source for the benefit of another entity or individuals and
the state agency does not retain ownership of any part of the
acquisition as a result of the transaction; or
10. The Secretary of State when selecting a vendor for
publication of the Oklahoma Statutes in accordance with Section 13
of Title 75 of the Oklahoma Statutes; or
11. The Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department for
purchases set forth in Section 2 of this act.
B. The State Purchasing Director may form an advisory committee
consisting of representatives from entities exempted from the
provisions of the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act. The purpose of
ENR. S. B. NO. 1365 Page 2

the committee shall be to allow committee members to provide input
into the development of shared state purchasing contracts,
collaboratively participate in the integration of their purchasing
platforms or electronic purchasing catalogs, analyze solutions that
may be used by state government to meet the purchasing needs of the
entities, explore joint purchases of general use items that result
in mutual procurement of quality goods and services at the lowest
reasonable cost and explore flexibility, administrative relief and
transformation changes through utilization of procurement
technology.
C. At the invitation of the State Purchasing Director, entities
exempted from the provisions of the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act
shall participate in the advisory committee referenced in subsection
B of this section.
D. The State Purchasing Director may invite representatives of
political subdivisions, and local common education entities to
participate as members of the advisory committee.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2211.1 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department shall be
exempt from the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act for purchases in an
amount not to exceed Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00)
related to merchandise for resale purchased for and sold over the
Internet, in publications, or through Department retail outlets
including, but not limited to, lodges, gift shops, golf course pro
shops, restaurants, and other purchases made for the production of
such merchandise.
B. An exemption authorized in this section shall not be
construed for the use of leasing or contracting for state-owned
restaurants in state parks.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1365 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 25th day of February, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1365 Page 4